Ohio, session 136, HB540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5709.122 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5709.122. (A) As used in this section : 7
(1) "Nonprofit conservation organization" means an 8
organization that is described under section 501(c)(3) of the 9
Internal Revenue Code and exempt from federal income taxation 10
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and the 11
primary purpose of which is to conserve the environment. 12
(2) "Qualifying real property" means real property that 13
meets all of the following criteria: 14
(a) The property is owned by a nonprofit conservation 15
organization or its subsidiary, or such an organization or its 16
subsidiary owns an interest in the property. 17
(b) The property or the organization's interest in the 18
property is exempt from taxation under section 5709.12 or 19

H. B. No. 540 Page 2
As Introduced
5790.121 of the Revised Code as land used exclusively for 20
charitable purposes. 21
(c) The total area of the property located in a single 22
county is more than fifteen thousand acres. 23
"Qualifying real property" does not include any portion of 24
such property that is used primarily for meetings, research or 25
educational activities, or the administration of a nonprofit 26
conservation organization. 27
(3) "Unimproved taxable value" means the taxable value of 28
qualifying real property for the current tax year, exclusive of 29
improvements, and assuming that the property was subject to 30
taxation. 31
(B) On or before the thirtieth day of June of each year, 32
beginning in 2026, a nonprofit conservation organization shall 33
pay to the county treasurer of each county in which qualifying 34
real property is located an amount equal to two and one-half per 35
cent of the unimproved taxable value of qualifying real property 36
located within that county. 37
(C) Within thirty days after receiving a payment under 38
division (B) of this section, the county auditor shall 39
distribute the money among the taxing units within the territory 40
of which the qualifying real property is located in proportion 41
to the amount of taxes that would have been collected and 42
distributed to those taxing units with respect to such property 43
if the property was subject to taxation. 44
(D) Money received by a taxing unit under this section 45
shall be used for any lawful purpose. 46
(E) If a payment required under this section is not paid 47
when due, the unpaid amount shall be collected in the same 48

H. B. No. 540 Page 3
As Introduced
manner provided for the collection of delinquent real property 49
taxes. 50